New York, session 2025-2026, S6510.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision d of section 26-601 of the administrative code 2 of the city of New York, as separately amended by local law numbers 75 3 and 76 of the city of New York for the year 2005, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 d. "Eligible head of the household" means (1) a person or [his or her] 6 their spouse who is sixty-two years of age or older, or (2) a person, 7 their spouse or their child who qualifies as a person with a disability 8 pursuant to section 26-617 of this chapter and is entitled to the 9 possession or to the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit, provided, 10 however, that with respect to a dwelling which was subject to a mortgage 11 insured or initially insured by the federal government pursuant to 12 section two hundred thirteen of the national housing act, as amended, 13 "eligible head of the household" shall be limited to that person [or], 14 [his or her] their spouse or their child if such child qualifies as a 15 person with a disability pursuant to section 26-617 of this chapter, who 16 was entitled to possession or the use and occupancy of such dwelling 17 unit at the time of termination of such mortgage, and whose income when 18 combined with the income of all other members of the household whose 19 head of household is sixty-two years of age or older does not exceed 20 twenty-five thousand dollars beginning July first, two thousand five, 21 twenty-six thousand dollars beginning July first, two thousand six, 22 twenty-seven thousand dollars beginning July first, two thousand seven, 23 twenty-eight thousand dollars beginning July first, two thousand eight, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10962-01-5 S. 6510 2 1 and twenty-nine thousand dollars beginning July first, two thousand 2 nine, for the taxable period, or whose income for the current income tax 3 year when combined with the income of all members of the household 4 residing in the housing accommodation whose head of the household is a 5 person with a disability does not exceed the maximum income above which 6 such head of the household would not be eligible to receive cash supple- 7 mental security income benefits under federal law during such tax year. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.